Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3551
Hospital district; board of directors; officers; books and records; open to inspection.

The board of directors shall annually select such officers as may be necessary. The board shall cause to be kept accurate minutes of all meetings and accurate records and books of accounts, conforming to approved methods of bookkeeping, clearly reflecting the entire operation, management, and business of the district, which shall be kept at the principal place of business of the district. All books, papers, and vouchers shall be subject to public inspection at all reasonable hours.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 24, p. 382;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.43.